dictsource/kek_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Q'eqchi'

.L01 b ch ch' h j k k' l m n p q q' r s t t' tz tz' w y z  // Consonants

.replace
       ʼ       '     // replace modified apostrophe to simple apostrophe

.group a
    a       a
	a (_   'a
	a (L01_ 'a
	aa      a:
	aa (_   'a:
	aa (L01_ 'a:
	ay       aI
	ay (_    'aI

.group b
    b       b

.group c
    c       ts
    ch      tS
    ch'     tS?


.group e
    e       e
	e (_   'e
	e (L01_ 'e
	ee      e:
	ee (_   'e:
	ee (L01_ 'e:
	ey       eI
	ey (_    'eI

.group h
    h       h

.group i
    i       i
	i (_   'i
	i (L01_ 'i
	ii      i:
	ii (_   'i:
	ii (L01_ 'i:

.group j
    j       x

.group k
    k       k
    k'      k?
	kw      gw
	ky      d;

.group l
    l       l

.group m
    m       m

.group n
    n       n

.group o
    o       o
	o (_   'o
	o (L01_ 'o
	oo      o:
	oo (_   'o:
	oo (L01_ 'o:
	oy      oI
	oy (_   'oI

.group p
    p       p

.group q
    q       q
    q'      q?

.group r
    r       *

.group s
    s       s

.group t
    t       t
    t'      t?
	tz      ts
	tz'     ts?

.group u
    u       u
	u (_   'u
	u (L01_ 'u
	uu      u:
	uu (_   'u:
	uu (L01_ 'i:
	uy       uI
	uy (_    'uI

.group w
    w       gw

.group x
    x       S
	
.group y
    y       k^

.group '
   '        ?
   
.group
    d       d
	
